Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.090

Uniform or supplemental benefits—Provision by certified health plan only—Uniform benefits package as minimum.

(1) On and after December 31, 1995, no person or entity in this state shall provide the uniform benefits package and supplemental benefits as defined in *RCW 43.72.010 without being certified as a certified health plan by the insurance commissioner.

(2) On and after December 31, 1995, no certified health plan may offer less than the uniform benefits package to residents of this state and no registered employer health plan may provide less than the uniform benefits package to its employees and their dependents.

(3) The health services commission may authorize renewal or continuation until December 31, 1996, of health care service contracts, disability group insurance, or health maintenance policies in effect on December 31, 1995.

[ 1995 c 2 s 1; 1993 c 492 s 427.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.72.010 was repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27, effective July 1, 1995.

(2) RCW 43.72.090 was also repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27 without cognizance of its amendment by 1995 c 2 s 1. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—1995 c 2: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [February 3, 1995]." [ 1995 c 2 s 5.]

Certification: Chapter 48.43 RCW.

PDFRCW 43.72.090

Uniform or supplemental benefits—Provision by certified health plan only—Uniform benefits package as minimum.

[ 1993 c 492 s 427.]
Repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27, effective July 1, 1995.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 43.72.090 was also amended by 1995 c 2 s 1 without cognizance of its repeal by 1995 c 265 s 27. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.